District of Columbia statutes.
38-605

Fee for examination by public health authorities; indigency.

A fee, based on rates to be established by the Mayor, shall be charged to a minor student’s parent(s) or guardian or an adult student when the student has been examined by public health authorities pursuant to this subchapter and the parent(s), guardian, or adult student is not indigent. The Mayor shall define “indigency” under this section and may establish a sliding scale of partial payment based on the parents’, guardian’s, or adult student’s reasonable ability to pay some of the examination costs. Under no circumstances shall a student be excluded from school pending the payment of a fee imposed under this section.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-66, § 6, 32 DCR 6086
1981 Ed., § 31-2405.
This section is referenced in § 38-606.